Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.410

Telecommunications systems installations—Subject to this subchapter.

(1) All installations of wires and equipment defined as telecommunications systems are subject to the requirements of this subchapter. Installations shall be in conformity with approved methods of construction for safety to life and property. The national electrical code, approved standards of the telecommunications industries association, the electronic industries association, the American national standards institute, and other safety standards approved by the department shall be evidence of approved methods of installation.

(2) This chapter may not limit the authority or power of any city or town to enact and enforce under authority given by law in RCW 19.28.141, any ordinance, or rule requiring an equal, higher, or better standard of construction and an equal, higher, or better standard of materials, devices, appliances, and equipment than that required by this chapter.

[ 2000 c 238 s 205.]

NOTES:

Severability—2000 c 238: See note following RCW 19.28.301.